Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-233
Constitutional convention; preliminary survey committee; expenses.

The members of the preliminary survey committee shall be paid expenses while engaged in the duties provided for by section 49-232 as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 22, p. 553;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 86;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 40.